Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-103
Game and Parks Commission; chairperson; election.

The members of the Game and Parks Commission shall meet in January of each year and shall elect a chairperson of the commission from the membership.

Laws 1929, c. 113, § 2, p. 443;

C.S.1929, § 81-6502;

Laws 1935, c. 174, § 2, p. 640;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-6502;

R.S.1943, § 81-802;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 81-802;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 3.